test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AL_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - sg̲ál - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AL_STEM_2

     sg̲ál+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲áalaa
     sg̲ál+V+INDIRECT+PAST: sg̲áalaan
     sg̲ál+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sg̲áalaas
     sg̲ál+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áalaa.ang
     sg̲ál+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sg̲áal'ahlanggang
     sg̲ál+V+CERTAIN+PAST: sg̲áal'ahlanggan
     sg̲ál+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áal'ahlanggiinii
     sg̲ál+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sg̲áal'ahlans
     sg̲ál+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: sg̲áalaa'ahlang
     sg̲ál+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sg̲áalaa'ahlanggaa
     sg̲ál+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sg̲áalaa'ahlanggang
     sg̲ál+V+REFLEXIVE: sg̲áal'ahl
